nb: Konfigurasjon av frontknapper: Dobbeltspent 4-knapp; Dobbeltspent 6-knapp; Enkeltspent 1-knapp; Enkeltspent 2-knapp; Enkeltspent 3-knapp; Annet
th: การจัดวางกระดุมด้านหน้า: กระดุมสองแถว 4 เม็ด; กระดุมสองแถว 6 เม็ด; กระดุมแถวเดียว 1 เม็ด; กระดุมแถวเดียว 2 เม็ด; กระดุมแถวเดียว 3 เม็ด; อื่นๆ
de: Konfiguration der Frontknöpfe: Zweireihig, 4 Knöpfe; Zweireihig, 6 Knöpfe; Einreihig, 1 Knopf; Einreihig, 2 Knöpfe; Einreihig, 3 Knöpfe; Sonstige
nl: Knoopsluiting voorzijde: Tweerijig 4-knoops; Tweerijig 6-knoops; Eenrijig 1-knoops; Eenrijig 2-knoops; Eenrijig 3-knoops; Anders
pt-PT: Configuração de botão da frente: Abotoamento duplo com 4 botões; Abotoamento duplo com 6 botões; Abotoamento simples com 1 botão; Abotoamento simples com 2 botões; Abotoamento simples com 3 botões; Outro
hu: Elülső gomb konfigurációja: Kétsoros, 4 gombos; Kétsoros, 6 gombos; Egysoros, 1 gombos; Egysoros, 2 gombos; Egysoros, 3 gombos; Egyéb
fr: Configuration des boutons avant: Croisé 4 boutons; Croisé 6 boutons; Droit 1 bouton; Droit 2 boutons; Droit 3 boutons; Autre
tr: Ön düğme düzeni: Kruvaze 4 düğmeli; Kruvaze 6 düğmeli; Tek sıra 1 düğmeli; Tek sıra 2 düğmeli; Tek sıra 3 düğmeli; Diğer
pl: Konfiguracja przycisków przednich: Dwurzędowa, 4 guziki; Dwurzędowa, 6 guzików; Jednorzędowa, 1 guzik; Jednorzędowa, 2 guziki; Jednorzędowa, 3 guziki; Inna
en: Front button configuration: Double-breasted 4-button; Double-breasted 6-button; Single-breasted 1-button; Single-breasted 2-button; Single-breasted 3-button; Other
sl-SI: Konfiguracija gumbov na sprednji strani: Dvoredno, 4 gumbi; Dvoredno, 6 gumbov; Enoredno, 1 gumb; Enoredno, 2 gumba; Enoredno, 3 gumbi; Drugo
bg-BG: Конфигурация на предното копче: Двуредно закопчаване, 4 копчета; Двуредно закопчаване, 6 копчета; Едноредно закопчаване, 1 копче; Едноредно закопчаване, 2 копчета; Едноредно закопчаване, 3 копчета; Друго
hr-HR: Konfiguracija prednjih gumba: Dvoredno s 4 gumba; Dvoredno sa 6 gumba; Jednoredno s 1 gumbom; Jednoredno s 2 gumba; Jednoredno s 3 gumba; Ostalo
sk-SK: Konfigurácia predných tlačidiel: Dvojradové na 4 gombíky; Dvojradové na 6 gombíkov; Jednoradové na 1 gombík; Jednoradové na 2 gombíky; Jednoradové na 3 gombíky; Iné
el: Διαμόρφωση μπροστινού κουμπιού: Σταυρωτό 4 κουμπιών; Σταυρωτό 6 κουμπιών; Μονόπετο 1 κουμπιού; Μονόπετο 2 κουμπιών; Μονόπετο 3 κουμπιών; Άλλο
lt-LT: Priekinio mygtuko konfigūracija: Dvieiliai 4 sagų; Dvieiliai 6 sagų; Vienaeiliai 1 sagos; Vienaeiliai 2 sagų; Vienaeiliai 3 sagų; Kita
ro-RO: Configurația butonului frontal: La două rânduri cu 4 nasturi; La două rânduri cu 6 nasturi; La un rând cu 1 nasture; La un rând cu 2 nasturi; La un rând cu 3 nasturi; Altele
vi: Cấu hình nút bấm phía trước: 2 hàng 4 khuy; 2 hàng 6 khuy; 1 hàng 1 khuy; 1 hàng 2 khuy; 1 hàng 3 khuy; Khác
cs: Nastavení předních tlačítek: Dvouřadé, 4 knoflíky; Dvouřadé, 6 knoflíků; Jednořadé, 1 knoflík; Jednořadé, 2 knoflíky; Jednořadé, 3 knoflíky; Ostatní
sv: Knappkonfiguration fram: Dubbelknäppt 4 knappar; Dubbelknäppt 6 knappar; Enkelknäppt 1 knapp; Enkelknäppt 2 knappar; Enkelknäppt 3 knappar; Övrigt
ja: フロントボタン構造: ダブルブレスト 4つボタン; ダブルブレスト 6つボタン; シングルブレスト 1つボタン; シングルブレスト 2つボタン; シングルブレスト 3つボタン; その他
ru: Конфигурация пуговиц на полочке: Двубортная, 4 пуговицы; Двубортная, 6 пуговиц; Однобортная, 1 пуговица; Однобортная, 2 пуговицы; Однобортная, 3 пуговицы; Другое
fi: Etunappien konfiguraatio: Kaksirivinen, 4 nappia; Kaksirivinen, 6 nappia; Yksirivinen, 1 nappi; Yksirivinen, 2 nappia; Yksirivinen, 3 nappia; Muu
ko: 전면 버튼 구성: 더블 브레스티드 4버튼; 더블 브레스티드 6버튼; 싱글 브레스티드 1버튼; 싱글 브레스티드 2버튼; 싱글 브레스티드 3버튼; 기타
es: Configuración del botón delantero: Cruzado de 4 botones; Cruzado de 6 botones; Sencillo de 1 botón; Sencillo de 2 botones; Sencillo de 3 botones; Otro
da: Konfiguration af forknop: Dobbeltradet med 4 knapper; Dobbeltradet med 6 knapper; Enkeltradet med 1 knap; Enkeltradet med 2 knapper; Enkeltradet med 3 knapper; Andet
it: Configurazione dei pulsanti anteriori: Doppiopetto a 4 bottoni; Doppiopetto a 6 bottoni; Monopetto a 1 bottone; Monopetto a 2 bottoni; Monopetto a 3 bottoni; Altro
zh-TW: 前鈕扣配置: 雙排 4 釦; 雙排 6 釦; 單排 1 釦; 單排 2 釦; 單排 3 釦; 其他
zh-CN: 前襟纽扣配置: 双排 4 扣; 双排 6 扣; 单排 1 扣; 单排 2 扣; 单排 3 扣; 其他
pt-BR: Configuração do botão frontal: Abotoamento duplo com 4 botões; Abotoamento duplo com 6 botões; Abotoamento simples com 1 botão; Abotoamento simples com 2 botões; Abotoamento simples com 3 botões; Outro